Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 32

General Provisions

Subchapter 1

— Regulation of Alternative Livestock

2-32-101. Alternate livestock.

(1)All creatures of the ratite family that are not indigenous to this state, including, but not limited to, ostriches, emus, and rheas;

All creatures of the cervidae family that are not indigenous to this state, including, but not limited to, deer and elk; and

All creatures of the camelidae family, including, but not limited to, llamas, alpacas, and guanacos

Alternate livestock shall be considered farm animals or farm birds and shall be subject to all appropriate laws and rules relating to farm animals.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 377, § 1; 1995, No. 591, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Contract Protection Act

2-32-201. Production contracts — Definitions.

As used in this section:

A production contract shall:

Be written in a readable form and be accompanied by a clearly written disclosure statement, signed by the grower, setting forth the nature of the material risk faced by all growers if the growers enter into the production contract;

Be negotiated, entered into, and executed in an environment free from unfair or deceptive trade practices or other violations of law;

Not prohibit or discourage a grower from associating with other growers to compare production contract terms or to address concerns or problems;

Not prohibit or discourage growers from seeking professional, legal, financial, and agricultural production advice and counsel related to the production contract's terms, obligations, and responsibilities;

(A)Not deny a party to the production contract the ability to address a dispute in a court of competent jurisdiction.

This subsection shall not affect another provision of a production contract, including a contract or related document, policy, or agreement that can be given effect without the voided provision.

In a civil action against the contractor, the court may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation expenses.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1253, § 1; 2015, No. 1169, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Equine Monitoring

2-32-301. Equine monitoring by identification chips.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1585, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Livestock Owner's Lien Act

2-32-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Livestock Owner's Lien Act”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Affiliate” means a person that:

Is directly or indirectly controlled by a first purchaser; or

Directly or indirectly controls a first purchaser;

“Agreement to sell” means an enforceable oral or written agreement by which a livestock owner, either directly or through a sales agent, agrees to sell livestock to a first purchaser;

“Control” or “controlled by” means the direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person through ownership, by contract, or otherwise;

“First purchaser” means the first person that purchases livestock, either directly or indirectly through a sales agent, under an agreement to sell;

“Livestock” means cattle, bison, horses, sheep, goats, asses, mules, swine, domesticated rabbits, chickens, turkeys, and other domesticated animals raised primarily for human food consumption;

“Livestock owner” means a person owning an interest in livestock before the acquisition of the livestock by a first purchaser;

“Owner's lender” means a person that has a valid mortgage lien or security interest in a livestock owner's livestock at the time the livestock is delivered to the first purchaser;

“Owner's lien” means a lien granted under this subchapter;

“Permitted lien” means the following liens or security interests:

A mortgage lien or security interest granted by a first purchaser that:

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness signed by the first purchaser and accepted in writing by the payee before August 16, 2013; and

Has a principal amount and a fixed maturity stated in the mortgage lien or security interest; and

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (9)(B)(iii).

Exists in and attaches immediately to all livestock on August 16, 2013; and

Continues uninterrupted and without lapse:

In all livestock upon and after sale of the livestock; and

In and to all proceeds.

An owner's lien exists until the livestock owner or the sales agent entitled to receive the sales price has received the full amount of the sales price.

A security interest or mortgage lien of an owner's lender attaches to the livestock owner's right to an owner's lien in livestock or in proceeds from the sale of the livestock.

An owner's lender does not waive its security interest or mortgage lien or right in an owner's lien by approving or authorizing the livestock owner to sell the livestock under a sales agreement.

The validity of an owner's lien is not dependent on possession of the livestock by a livestock owner or sales agent.

An owner's lien is not void or expired by reason of a change or transfer of the actual or constructive possession of or title to the livestock from the livestock owner or sales agent to a first purchaser or subsequent purchaser.

A validly perfected and enforceable lien created by statute in relation to livestock purchased under an agreement to sell that secures payment of indebtedness incurred by the first purchaser before August 16, 2013.

“Permitted lien” does not include a mortgage lien or security interest that:

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness that is modified, amended, or restated from or after August 16, 2013, by a modification, amendment, or restatement that increases the principal amount that is owed on August 16, 2013;

Secures payment under a written instrument of indebtedness that is modified, amended, or restated from or after August 16, 2013, by a modification, amendment, or restatement that extends the stated maturity of the written instrument of indebtedness that is in effect on August 16, 2013; or

Is not validly perfected with a first priority against the claims of all persons under applicable law other than a person holding a statutory or regulatory lien as to which first priority is granted by statute or rule;

“Person” means an individual or business entity, including without limitation an executor, administrator, estate, agent, trust, trustee, institution, receiver, business trust, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, cooperative, joint venture, governmental entity or agency, association, and any other legal entity;

“Proceeds” means:

A right or amount paid or to be paid in consideration of or as a consequence of the sale of livestock, including without limitation cash proceeds, accounts, chattel paper, instruments, and payment intangibles;

A by-product from the slaughter of livestock; and

A right or amount paid or to be paid in consideration of or as a consequence of the sale of a by-product from the slaughter of livestock;

“Purchaser” means a person that:

Is not an affiliate of a first purchaser; and

Takes, receives, or purchases livestock from a first purchaser;

(A)“Sales agent” means a person that is authorized to sell livestock on behalf of or for the benefit of another person.

“Sales agent” includes without limitation a livestock auction, auctioneer, commission company, or broker; and

“Sales price” means the amount a first purchaser agrees to pay a livestock owner or a sales agent under an agreement to sell.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1; 2019, No. 315, § 20.

2-32-403. Livestock lien.

(1)To secure the obligations of a first purchaser to pay the sales price, a livestock owner is granted a lien in all livestock sold by the livestock owner for any unpaid portion of the sales price for the livestock.

The lien granted under this section is granted and shall exist as part of and incident to the ownership of livestock.

An owner's lien:

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-404. Perfection of livestock lien.

An owner's lien is perfected automatically from August 16, 2013, or the date a sales agreement is executed after August 16, 2013, without the need to file a financing statement or other type of documentation.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-405. Commingled livestock — Priority.

If livestock subject to an owner's lien are commingled with other livestock in a manner that the identity of the specific livestock subject to the owner's lien cannot be determined by reasonable means, the owner's lien continues without interruption into and attaches to the commingled livestock and is perfected automatically as of the date of its original perfection but only as to the percentage of the commingled livestock equal to the number of livestock to which the owner's lien originally attached.

An owner's lien in commingled livestock under subsection (a) of this section has priority over any security interest or other lien that is not an owner's lien or permitted lien regardless of whether the security interest or other lien has been properly perfected.

If more than one (1) owner's lien attaches to commingled livestock, the owners' liens rank equally in the proportion that the respective sales prices secured by each owner's lien bear as a percentage of the total of the sales prices secured by all owners' liens applicable at the time the livestock were commingled.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-406. Transfer of lien — Priority.

(1)A purchaser or sales agent takes free of an owner's lien otherwise applicable to the livestock purchased and is relieved of any obligations created under §2-32-403 if the purchaser or sales agent pays the full amount of required consideration for the livestock under a good faith, noncollusive agreement to purchase the livestock.

If a purchaser or sales agent pays the full amount of consideration under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the owner's lien transfers to the proceeds paid by the purchaser or sales agent.

An owner's lien shall continue uninterrupted in the proceeds paid to or otherwise due the first purchaser.

Except as specifically provided in this section, an owner's lien has priority over the rights of a purchaser or sales agent.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-407. Lien priority generally.

Except for a permitted lien, an owner's lien takes priority over any other lien regardless of whether the lien arises by contract, law, equity, or otherwise.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-408. Applicability.

This subchapter does not affect the time at which legal title to livestock may pass by agreement or operation of law subject to an owner's lien.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-409. Waiver, relinquishment, or release of lien prohibited.

A livestock owner shall not be required as a condition or term of an agreement to sell or otherwise to:

Waive, relinquish, or release an owner's lien or any rights under this subchapter other than upon payment in full of the sales price; or

Agree to a provision that would apply the law of a state other than the State of Arkansas with respect to the rights granted under this subchapter.

A waiver, relinquishment, release, or provision that violates subdivision (a)(1) of this section is void as a matter of the public policy of this state.

A livestock owner or a sales agent acting on behalf of a livestock owner may waive, relinquish, or release an owner's lien or any rights under this subchapter or agree to a provision that would apply the law of a state other than the State of Arkansas with respect to the rights granted under this subchapter if the first purchaser:

Posts a letter of credit in a form and amount satisfactory to the livestock owner or sales agent; or

Both:

Executes a contract that is satisfactory to the livestock owner or sales agent to prepay or escrow the sales price under an agreement to sell that is satisfactory to the livestock owner; and

Performs all of the first purchaser's obligations under the contract.

An owner's lien expires one (1) year after the last day of the month following the date the sales price from the sale of livestock subject to the lien is required by law or contract to be paid to the livestock owner but only as to the particular livestock sold during the month unless an action to enforce the owner's lien is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction during that time.

If a sales agent advances the sales price for livestock to the livestock owner before the first purchaser pays the sales price in full to the livestock owner or sales agent, the sales agent shall assume and may enforce all rights of the livestock owner under this subchapter as to the livestock or the proceeds from the sale of the livestock.

In addition to any other court of competent jurisdiction, an action to enforce an owner's lien may be commenced in the district court of the county in which the:

Agreement to sell is executed;

Sales price is to be paid;

The livestock that have not been paid for are located; or

Proceeds may be found.

The commencement of one (1) or more of the following proceedings by or against a person claiming an interest in property subject to an owner's lien tolls the one-year period in which to commence an action to enforce the owner's lien under subsection (a) of this section for an additional period of ninety (90) days from the earlier of the final conclusion or dismissal of the proceedings or the date final relief is obtained from the applicable tribunal authorizing the commencement of the action:

An action seeking to adjudicate the person as bankrupt or insolvent;

An action seeking liquidation, winding up, reorganization, arrangement, adjustment, protection, relief, or composition of the person or the person's debts under any law relating to bankruptcy, insolvency, or reorganization or relief of debtors; or

An action seeking the entry of an order for relief or the appointment of a receiver, trustee, or other similar official for the person or for a substantial part of the person's property.

The prevailing party in an action to enforce this subchapter may recover costs and reasonable attorney's fees in any legal proceeding.

This subchapter does not impair or affect the right of a livestock owner or a sales agent to maintain a personal action to recover the debt against a person liable for payment of the sales price or to exercise any other available rights and remedies.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-410. Lien expiration — Action on an owner's lien.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

2-32-411. Preference.

If this subchapter conflicts with other rights a livestock owner may have, the livestock owner's right to receive the sales price shall be given preference.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 499, §
1.

Subchapter 5

— Administrative Proceedings

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-32-501. Administrative penalties.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may impose administrative penalties not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation against a person who violates any provision of this subtitle or any rule adopted by the commission under this subtitle.

The imposition of administrative penalties shall be conducted under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The commission or the commission's designee may issue subpoenas.

If a person against whom an administrative penalty has been imposed by the commission as authorized under this section fails to pay the penalty to the commission, the commission may file an action to collect the administrative penalty in the circuit court of the county in which the person resides.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “or the commission's designee” for “or the Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” in (c).

The county sheriff of the county in which the person resides;

The deputy of the county sheriff; or

Any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state.

Comply with the subpoena;

Appear before the commission;

Produce the relevant documents; and

Give his or her testimony upon matters as may be lawfully required; and

Punish for contempt a person who fails to obey an order under this section, if the person disobeys a subpoena.

If a person is not domiciled in this state, the circuit court of the county in which the hearing is held or is to be held shall have jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 18; 2019, No. 910, § 25.

2-32-502. Subpoenas — Refusal to testify.

The Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission or a member of the commission may issue a subpoena for a witness to require his or her attendance and testimony before the commission, and to require the production of books, papers, and records in any proceeding before the commission that may be material to questions before the commission.

The subpoena under subsection (a) of this section shall be served by:

If a person fails or refuses to comply with a subpoena issued by the commission or a member of the commission, or refuses to testify or answer to a matter in which he or she may lawfully be interrogated, the circuit court of the county in which the person is domiciled, on application of the commission may:

In term time or vacation, issue an attachment for the person;

Compel the person to:

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 18.

2-32-503. Administration of oath to witnesses.

A member of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission or his or her attorney may administer an oath to any witness in any hearing, investigation, or proceeding under this subtitle.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 18.

2-32-504. Appellate review.

A person affected by a rule, action, or order made by the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission may obtain review of the rule, action, or order under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 18.

2-32-505. Disposition of fees and penalties.

Fees paid and penalties collected under this subtitle shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues credited to the Livestock and Poultry Commission Disease and Pest Control Fund.

Fees or penalties collected under this subtitle shall be cash funds when received by the Treasurer of State and shall not be deposited into or deemed a part of the State Treasury for the purpose of:

Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29;

Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12;

Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20; or

Any other constitutional or statutory provision.

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this subchapter” in §§2-33-101 —2-33-114 may not apply to §2-33-115 which was enacted subsequently.

Acts 2005, No. 2125, § 22, provided:

“TYPE 2 TRANSFER. Effective July 1, 2005, all duties, functions, records, property, obligations, personnel, and authority to levy and collect diagnostic and laboratory fees, pursuant to Arkansas Code §2-33-111 and §2-33-112, for the Springdale Laboratory of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission are hereby transferred by a Type 2 transfer from the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission to the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas.”

Cross References. Allocation of funds for joint county fairs and livestock shows, §2-36-303.

Effective Dates. Acts 1963, No. 87, § 16: Feb. 27, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found that notwithstanding the fact that the commission will not have the functions performable by it hereunder until April 1, 1963, it is necessary that immediate action be taken by the governor to appoint, and by the senate to confirm the appointment of, the members of the commission in order that the commission may organize and begin to prepare its plan of operations so that there may be no disruption of service on and after that date, and that only by the immediate operation of this act may such condition be obviated. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 450, § 10: Mar. 19, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that services promoting the agriculture industry of Arkansas may be better performed by the state agency delegated this responsibility by, generally, reestablishing this agency and updating pertinent legislation; that such legislation has been proposed to the sixty-fourth General Assembly; that this act is necessary to provide appropriations for the proposed Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 867, § 5: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the livestock and poultry industry of this state and the growth of such industry that the Livestock and Poultry Commission be separated from the Department of Commerce; that this act is designed to accomplish the same; that the Livestock and Poultry Commission should be established as an independent agency at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that unless an emergency is declared this act will not go into effect on July 1, 1981. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 366, § 27: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 302, § 3: Mar. 12, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the members of the Livestock and Poultry Commission serve without pay and that the per diem they receive for commission meetings is not adequate; that this act provides a more reasonable amount of per diem and that until this act becomes effective the commissioners will continue to receive an unreasonably low rate or per diem. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1174, § 27: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 236, § 34: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 1011, § 18.